Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-912.03
Tax Equalization and Review Commission; exemption.

Sections 84-912.01 and 84-913 to 84-919 do not apply to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 190;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 68.

Tax Equalization and Review Commission Act, see section 77-5001.